Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1007
Board, defined.

Board means the Board of Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 7;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-346;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 269.